Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,239
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) The COVID-19 public health emergency has caused widespread economic, social, and public health-related turmoil that deepened existing disparities;

(2) The social and economic challenges caused and exacerbated by the COVID-19 public health emergency include high unemployment, wage decreases, increased homelessness, and food insecurity;

(3) The impact of the COVID-19 public health emergency and related challenges were disproportionately felt in low-income and minority communities such as North Omaha and South Omaha;

(4) The social and economic challenges in North Omaha and South Omaha have persisted for multiple generations, partially fueled by past racial segregation and the historical practice known as redlining;

(5) Funding under the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 presents a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to respond to the challenges facing North Omaha and South Omaha that have been worsened by the COVID-19 public health emergency; and

(6) Federal guidance issued by the United States Department of the Treasury has identified qualified census tracts as areas in which certain activities and investments will be deemed presumptively eligible for the use of funds under the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021.

Laws 2022, LB1024, § 2.
April 19, 2022